apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
    <pardef n="i__vbntr">
      <e><p><l>i</l>                <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>               <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l>               <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l>               <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intan</l>            <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intajn</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>antaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>antan</l>            <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>antajn</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ontaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ante</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inte</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l>                <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>antaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igi</l>              <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igas</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igis</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igos</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igus</l>             <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintan</l>          <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintajn</l>         <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iganta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igantaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igantan</l>          <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igantajn</l>         <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igantan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igantan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igonta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igontaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igante</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginte</l>           <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igu</l>              <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igantaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iganta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="alpaŝi">                         <i>alpaŝ</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="aparteni">                       <i>aparten</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="bleki">                          <i>blek</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="bruli">                          <i>brul</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="danĝeri">                        <i>danĝer</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="degutadi">                       <i>degutad</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="dependi">                        <i>depend</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="diskuri">                        <i>diskur</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="dormeti">                        <i>dormet</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ekdormi">                        <i>ekdorm</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="eksalti">                        <i>eksalt</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="elgliti">                        <i>elglit</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="elveturi">                       <i>elvetur</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="enui">                           <i>enu</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="fanfaroni">                      <i>fanfaron</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="fervori">                        <i>fervor</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="flosi">                          <i>flos</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="formalaperi">                    <i>formalaper</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="forveturi">                      <i>forvetur</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="funebri">                        <i>funebr</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ĝeni sin">                       <i>ĝen</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>sin</l><r><g><b/>sin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="glori sin">                      <i>glor</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>sin</l><r><g><b/>sin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="haladzi">                        <i>haladz</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="honti">                          <i>hont</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="intersekci sin">                 <i>intersekc</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>sin</l><r><g><b/>sin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ĵurrompi">                       <i>ĵurromp</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="kavi">                           <i>kav</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="koncentri sin">                  <i>koncentr</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>sin</l><r><g><b/>sin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="konsenti pri">                   <i>konsent</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>pri</l><r><g><b/>pri</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="kraketi">                        <i>kraket</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="labori">                         <i>labor</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="malprosperi">                    <i>malprosper</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="militservi">                     <i>militserv</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="negoci">                         <i>negoc</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="pasumi">                         <i>pasum</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="petoli">                         <i>petol</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="pluvi">                          <i>pluv</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="provizi per">                    <i>proviz</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>per</l><r><g><b/>per</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="reiri">                          <i>reir</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="revi">                           <i>rev</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="rukti">                          <i>rukt</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="ŝimi">                           <i>ŝim</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="subfali">                        <i>subfal</i><par n="i__vbntr"/></e>
    <e lm="teni sin">                       <i>ten</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>sin</l><r><g><b/>sin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="turmenti sin">                   <i>turment</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>sin</l><r><g><b/>sin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="veni el">                        <i>ven</i><par n="i__vbntr"/><p><l><b/>el</l><r><g><b/>el</g></r></p></e>
